Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-102
Quorum.

A court of impeachment shall have power to proceed with a trial only when two-thirds of all the members thereof are in attendance, but any less number shall have power to adjourn to any reasonable time.

Laws 1879, § 2, p. 82;

R.S.1913, § 1129;

C.S.1922, § 1058;

C.S.1929, § 27-102;

R.S.1943, § 24-102.